Maine, session 132, LD337.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17 MRSA §3204, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 452, Pt. I, §55 and
affected by Pt. X, §2, is amended by repealing the first blocked paragraph.
Sec. 2. 17 MRSA §3205, as amended by PL 2021, c. 275, §4, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 17 MRSA §3207, as amended by PL 1965, c. 172, §1, is repealed.
Sec. 4. 17 MRSA §3241 is repealed.
Page 1 - 132LR0699(02)